Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-6223.01
Application
fee; disposition; waiver.

Each application shall
be accompanied by an application fee of five hundred dollars to be submitted
at the time the letter of intent is filed. The division shall remit all application
fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the Professional and
Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund. The application fee shall
not be refundable, but the director may waive all or part of the fee if he
or she finds it to be in the public interest to do so. Such a finding by the
director may include, but shall not be limited to, circumstances in which
the director determines that the application would be eligible for review
and:

(1) The applicant group is an agency of state government;

(2) Members of the applicant group will not be materially
affected by the implementation of the proposed regulation or change in scope
of practice; or

(3) Payment of the application fee would impose unreasonable
hardship on members of the applicant group.

Laws 1988, LB 384, § 14;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 18.